Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,161
Definitions.

(MBCA 11.01) As used in sections 21-2,161
to 21-2,168:

(1) Merger means a business
combination pursuant to section 21-2,162.

(2) Party to a merger or party to a share exchange
means any domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that will:

(i) Merge under a plan of
merger;

(ii)
Acquire shares or eligible interests of another corporation or an eligible
entity in a share exchange; or

(iii) Have all of its shares or eligible interests
or all of one or more classes or series of its shares or eligible interests
acquired in a share exchange.

(3)
Share exchange means a business combination pursuant to section 21-2,163.

(4) Survivor in a merger
means the corporation or eligible entity into which one or more other corporations
or eligible entities are merged. A survivor of a merger may preexist the merger
or be created by the merger.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 161.